Vermont, session 2025-2026, S159.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 248a is amended to read:
§ 248a. CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC GOOD FOR COMMUNICATIONS
FACILITIES
* * *
(i) Sunset of Commission authority. Effective on July 1, 2026, no new
applications for certificates of public good under this section may be
considered by the Commission. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385464 v.1